Washington statutes.
RCW 18.120.050

Continuing education requirements—Legislative proposals—Evidence of effectiveness.

Requirements for licensees to engage in continuing education as a condition of continued licensure has not been proven to be an effective method of guaranteeing or improving the competence of licensees or the quality of care received by the consumer. The legislature has serious reservations concerning the appropriateness of mandated continuing education. Any legislative proposal which contains a continuing education requirement should be accompanied by evidence that such a requirement has been proven effective for the profession addressed in the legislation.

[ 1984 c 279 s 58.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.